Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202539-1724
County board resolution ordering public hearing; publication; service of notice on adjacent landowners and municipality.

(1)(a) The county board shall adopt a resolution fixing the time, date, and place for a public hearing on the issue of vacating or abandoning a public road when:

(i) The county board receives the report described in section 39-1722; or

(ii) The county board by resolution proposes to vacate or abandon a public road that was previously declared a public road pursuant to section 39-1410 as such section existed prior to September 3, 2025.

(b) The resolution fixing the time, date, and place for the public hearing shall contain a clear and unambiguous description of the road to be vacated or abandoned.

(2) The county board shall cause such resolution to be published once a week for three consecutive weeks in a legal newspaper published in the county or, if none is published in the county, in a legal newspaper of general circulation in the county.

(3)(a) Whenever possible the county board shall cause copies of such resolution to be served by either registered or certified mail upon:

(i) The owners of land abutting on or adjacent to the road to be vacated or abandoned; and

(ii) The planning and public works directors of a city of the metropolitan, primary, or first class when such road or any part thereof is within the area of the zoning jurisdiction of such city.

(b) Such copies shall be mailed to the last-known address of each person described in subdivision (a) of this subsection not less than two weeks in advance of the hearing.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. IV, § 24, p. 548;

Laws 1971, LB 192, § 3;

Laws 1980, LB 607, § 3;

Laws 1986, LB 960, § 30;

Laws 2025, LB373, § 3.